test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv17_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: mastur
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: mastur
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: mastur
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: mastrar
    mastur+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: mastrar
    mastur+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: mastrum
    mastur+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: mastra
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: masturin
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: mastrina
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: mastrini
    mastur+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: mastrarinnar
    mastur+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: mastrarnar
    mastur+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: mastrunum
    mastur+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: mastranna
